test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_tiettid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - tiettiđ: # MLO, checked
    tiettiđ+V+Inf: tiettiđ
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiäđám
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tiäđáh
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiätá
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tietteen
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: tietivettee
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: tiettiv
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tiettip
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tietivetteđ
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tietih
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tiettim
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tiettih
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tieđij
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: tieđijm
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: tieđijd
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: tieđijn
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tieđijm
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tieđijd
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tiettii
    tiettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: tiäđáččim
    tiettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: tiäđáččih
    tiettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: tiäđáččij
    tiettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: tiäđáččáim
    tiettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: tiäđáččáid
    tiettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: tiäđáččáin
    tiettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: tiäđáččijm
    tiettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: tiäđáččijd
    tiettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: tiäđáččii
    tiettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: tieđeem
    tiettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: tieđeeh
    tiettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: tieđiš
    tiettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: tieđižeen
    tiettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: tieđišvettee
    tiettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: tieđižává
    tiettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: tieđižep
    tiettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: tieđišvetteđ
    tiettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: tieđižeh
    tiettiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: tieđe
    tiettiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: tiäđus
    tiettiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: tiättoon
    tiettiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: tiettee
    tiettiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: tiättus
    tiettiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: tiättup
    tiettiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: tiettiđ
    tiettiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: tiättus
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tieđe
    tiettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: tiättám
    tiettiđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: tiäđáččii
    tiettiđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: tiäđáá
    tiettiđ+V+PrsPrc: tiettee
    tiettiđ+V+PrfPrc: tiättám
    tiettiđ+V+Actio+Nom: tiettim
    tiettiđ+V+Actio+Ess: tietimin
    tiettiđ+V+Actio+Loc: tietimist
    tiettiđ+V+Actio+Ill: tietimân
    tiettiđ+V+Actio+Com: tieđedijn
    tiettiđ+V+VAbess: tieđehánnáá
